Vermont, session 2025-2026, H850.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. chapter 141 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 141. PEACE OFFICERS
* * *
§ 2223. FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Child care facility” has the same meaning as in 33 V.S.A. § 3511.
VT LEG #386204 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.850
2026 Page 2 of 6
(2) “Employee” means any person engaged in service to an employer at
a sensitive location for wages, salary, or other compensation, and includes an
independent contractor.
(3) “Federal immigration authority” means a federal agency or
department, along with its employees or contractors, tasked with enforcement
of immigration law and border entry, including the Department of Homeland
Security, Immigration and Customs Enforcement, and U.S. Customs and
Border Protection.
(4) “Health care facility” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9402(6).
(5) “Public library” has the same meaning as in 22 V.S.A. § 101.
(6) “School” means a public school or an independent school approved
pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 166.
(7) “Sensitive location” means a school, health care facility, public
library, and child care facility.
(b) Immigration authorities on site.
(1) Upon a federal immigration authority appearing at a sensitive
location, no employee shall:
(A) grant access to the federal immigration authority into a nonpublic
area of the sensitive location unless a judicial warrant is presented by the
federal immigration authority that names a specific individual under arrest or
VT LEG #386204 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.850
2026 Page 3 of 6
subject to a search and the warrant is reviewed by a supervisor pursuant to
subdivision (2) of this subsection (b); or
(B) obstruct the federal immigration authority from entering a
nonpublic area of the sensitive location in the event the federal immigration
authority enters a nonpublic area of the sensitive location without having been
granted access pursuant to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1).
(2) A supervisor of a sensitive location shall:
(A) be the primary authority to review a judicial warrant presented by
a federal immigration authority at the sensitive location; and
(B) designate at least one other employee to serve as a designee of
the supervisor in the event that the supervisor is not present when a federal
immigration authority appears at the sensitive location.
Sec. 2. 28 V.S.A. § 101 is amended to read:
§ 101. POWERS OF THE DEPARTMENT
The Department is charged with the following powers:
(1) to establish, maintain, and administer such State correctional
facilities and programs as may be required for the custody, control,
correctional treatment, and rehabilitation of committed persons, and for the
safekeeping of such other persons as may be committed to the Department in
accordance with law;
VT LEG #386204 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.850
2026 Page 4 of 6
(2) to operate diagnostic and treatment programs and such other
programs deemed desirable to treat persons committed to the Department and
to further other purposes and objectives of this title;
(3) to administer the supervision of persons placed on probation and
released on parole and to administer probation and parole services;
(4) to employ such officers, employees, and agents as deemed necessary
to discharge the functions of the Department;
(5) to establish standards for the management, operation, personnel, and
program of all correctional facilities in the State;
(6) to act in an advisory capacity in assisting law enforcement agencies,
except federal immigration authorities, and communities in the prevention of
crime and delinquency;
(7) to enforce and administer such other laws as may be vested in the
Department;
(8) to enter into agreements for assistance in support of the operation of
jails or lockups in accordance with criteria established by the Department, and
to use the jails or lockups as provided in this title, except agreements or
cooperative arrangements to assist federal immigration authorities;
(9) notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State and the
Department shall not be responsible for the expense of detaining a person in
custody except as provided in this title; and
VT LEG #386204 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.850
2026 Page 5 of 6
(10) to charter, establish, and fund through grants such municipal
entities or nonprofit organizations as may be required for providing crime
prevention and restorative justice programs for offenders, victims of crime, and
the public.
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 102(b) is amended to read:
(b) The Commissioner is charged with the following powers:
* * *
(8) To cooperate with and accept funds from the federal government or
any agency thereof, except any federal immigration authority, for the purpose
of exercising the powers and responsibilities stated in this section.
* * *
Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES; CURRENT COOPERATION; TERMINATION;
REPORT
(a)(1) The Department of Corrections shall provide a written report
detailing the existence and scope of the agreements, cooperation, or assistance
provided to federal immigration authorities, including any financial and
resource implications.
(2) The report identified in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
submitted to the House Committees on Corrections and Institutions and on
Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate Committees on
VT LEG #386204 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.850
2026 Page 6 of 6
Institutions and on Government Operations within 30 days after passage of this
act.
(b) The Department of Corrections shall terminate any existing contracts or
agreements with federal immigration authorities within 30 days after passage
of this act except as required by federal law.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386204 v.1